District of Columbia statutes.
31-4717

Exemption from legal process — Group life policy or proceeds.

No policy of group life insurance, nor the proceeds thereof when paid to any employee or employees thereunder, shall be liable to attachment, garnishment, or other process, or to be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law, to pay any debt or liability of such employee, or his beneficiary, or any other person who may have a right thereunder, either before or after payment; nor shall the proceeds thereof, when not made payable to a named beneficiary, constitute a part of the estate of the employee for the payment of his debts.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1176, ch. 672, ch. V, § 17
1973 Ed., § 35-718.
1981 Ed., § 35-523.